District of Columbia statutes.
38-232

Reference to criminal justice or juvenile delinquency system.

Pursuant to the Gun-Free Schools Act of 1994, approved October 20, 1994 (108 Stat. 3908; 20 U.S.C. 8921 et seq.) [repealed, see now 20 U.S.C. § 7151 ] the Superintendent of Schools shall refer to the criminal justice or juvenile delinquency system, simultaneous with expulsion, any student who is expelled for bringing a weapon into a District of Columbia Public School.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-174, § 2(b), 43 DCR 4500

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-452.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-231.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 38-231.